Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 2

General Obligation Bonds

9-21-201. Authorization for the issuance of general obligation bonds.

Any local government is authorized to issue general obligation bonds under this part and part 1 of this chapter for a public works project.

“General obligation bonds” mean those bonds in which the local government incurs a definite and absolute obligation by pledging the full faith, credit and unlimited taxing power of the local government as to all taxable property in the local government or of a portion of the local government, if applicable, to the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds.

The bonds may be sold in such blocks as the governing body may by resolution determine.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 2-1.

Attorney General Opinions. If a county commission authorizes the issuance of general obligation bonds, a petition protesting issuance of the bonds is filed, and the county commission then rescinds its resolution authorizing the bonds, the county is not required to hold an election on the proposition to issue the bonds. OAG 13-87, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 88 (11/6/13).

9-21-202. Sale of general obligation bonds at below par value.

All general obligation bonds issued by any local government under the authority of this part and part 1 of this chapter shall be sold for not less than ninety-eight percent (98%) of par value and accrued interest as the governing body of the local government may direct. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent the sale of particular bonds constituting a part of a single issue or series of bonds at a price below that herein specified, as long as the total price paid by the purchaser for the entire issue or series of bonds offered for sale on any given date shall be not less than ninety-eight percent (98%) of par value of the entire issue or series of bonds and accrued interest; provided, that if any part of such issue or series of such general obligation bonds is to be sold at a zero (0) rate of interest or at an original issue discount, such bonds may be sold at not less than ninety-eight percent (98%) of the original reoffering price of such discount bonds and accrued interest.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 2-2.

9-21-203. Sale of general obligation bonds — Notices.

Any local government proposing to sell general obligation bonds, under parts 1 and 2 of this chapter, is authorized to sell such bonds at a competitive public sale. The local government shall publish a notice of sale at least five (5) days prior to the date on which the bonds are to be sold, either in a financial newspaper having national circulation, or via an electronic communication system that is generally available to the financial community. The notice of sale shall set forth the time, date and place of sale, the maximum amount of bonds to be sold, the maximum interest rate, the maximum discount, if any, that will be permitted, in dollars or as a percentage of par value, and the basis upon which the bonds will be awarded. If the principal amount of general obligation bonds to be sold is not greater than five million dollars ($5,000,000), then the notice of sale may be published either as set forth in this section, or in a newspaper having general circulation in the local government.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 2-3; 1995, ch. 67, § 1; 2005, ch. 393, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 67, § 3 provided that the provisions of Acts 1995, ch. 67 apply to tax year 1995.

9-21-204. Sale of general obligation bonds to a state or federal agency.

If any general obligation bonds are to be sold pursuant to a commitment of a state or federal agency to purchase the same, such bonds may be sold at a private negotiated sale to the state or federal agency without the necessity of any public advertisement of the sale or of the approval of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 2-4; 2005, ch. 393, § 3; 2010, ch. 868, § 44.

9-21-205. Initial general obligation bond resolution.

Prior to the issuance of general obligation bonds pursuant to this part and part 1 of this chapter, the governing body of the local government shall adopt a resolution (herein referred to as the “initial resolution”) determining to issue the general obligation bonds. The resolution shall state in substance:

The amount or maximum amount of general obligation bonds to be issued;

The public works project or projects for which the general obligation bonds are to be issued;

The rate or maximum rate of interest which the general obligation bonds are to bear; and

A brief concise statement that the general obligation bonds will be payable:

From ad valorem taxes levied upon all the taxable property in the local government or a portion of the local government, if applicable, and, if the latter, then a brief statement or description of such portion of the local government;

From revenues and, in the event of a deficiency in such revenues, from taxes; or

From taxes, and additionally secured by a pledge of revenues.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 2-5.

9-21-206. Publication of notice.

The initial resolution, together with a notice in substantially the following form, shall be published in full once in a newspaper of general circulation in the local government:

NOTICEThe foregoing resolution has been adopted. Unless within twenty (20) days from the date of the publication hereof, a petition signed by at least ten percent (10%) of the registered voters of the local government, (or the portion thereof being taxed for the bonds) shall have been filed with the (official charged with maintaining the records of the local government) protesting the issuance of the general obligation bonds, such bonds will be issued as proposed.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 2-6; 1993, ch. 514, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1993, ch. 514, § 11 provided that it is the legislative intent that the amendment by that act be prospective only, and apply to all bonds and notes issued or all contracts entered into after July 1, 1993, and that any initial resolution already published but not finalized be subject to the requirements of the law as it existed prior to that date.

Attorney General Opinions. Special elections on general obligation bonds for school purposes, OAG 99-034, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (2/18/99).

If a county commission authorizes the issuance of general obligation bonds, a petition protesting issuance of the bonds is filed, and the county commission then rescinds its resolution authorizing the bonds, the county is not required to hold an election on the proposition to issue the bonds. OAG 13-87, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 88 (11/6/13).

9-21-207. When an election is necessary.

No election upon a proposition for the issuance of general obligation bonds shall be necessary:

If the general obligation bonds are to be issued for water works or sewerage purposes and if the governing body, by a vote of three-fourths (¾) of its members then in office, determine and declare in the initial resolution that an emergency requires the issuance of such bonds, which determination and declaration shall be conclusive; or

In any case where a petition has not been filed within the time limit specified in § 9-21-206.

If a petition protesting the issuance of the general obligation bonds signed by at least ten percent (10%) of the registered voters of the local government, determined as of the date of publication of the notice required in § 9-21-206, or that portion, if applicable, which is liable to be taxed therefor, is filed with the official charged with maintaining the records of the local government within twenty (20) days from the publication of the initial resolution, then no general obligation bonds shall be issued without the assent of the majority of the registered voters in the local government or a portion of the local government, if applicable, voting upon a proposition for the issuance of the general obligation bonds in the manner provided by §§ 9-21-209 and 9-21-210. The county election commission shall certify to the local government within fifteen (15) days of receipt by the county election commission of any petition filed hereunder, the total number of registered voters as of the date of publication of the notice and the total number of valid signatures of registered voters signing the petition. Registered voters shall not withdraw their signatures from a petition after signing the petition.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 2-7; 1993, ch. 514, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1993, ch. 514, § 11 provided that it is the legislative intent that the amendment by that act be prospective only, and apply to all bonds and notes issued or all contracts entered into after July 1, 1993, and that any initial resolution already published but not finalized be subject to the requirements of the law as it existed prior to that date.

Attorney General Opinions. Special elections on general obligation bonds for school purposes, OAG 99-034, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (2/18/99).

If a county commission authorizes the issuance of general obligation bonds, a petition protesting issuance of the bonds is filed, and the county commission then rescinds its resolution authorizing the bonds, the county is not required to hold an election on the proposition to issue the bonds. OAG 13-87, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 88 (11/6/13).

If a local government rescinds a resolution authorizing the issuance of general obligation bonds—on which a referendum election would have been required—and instead adopts a different debt financing plan—on which a referendum election would not normally be required—the local government does not have to hold an election. OAG 18-41, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 40 (9/4/2018).

9-21-208. Voluntary election.

If the governing body of the local government makes a decision to issue general obligation bonds for a public works project, and concurrently decides to hold an election for ascertaining the will of the electorate, then it need not adopt and publish an initial resolution and notice, but it shall adopt an election resolution in accordance with §9-21-209 and it shall hold an election in accordance with §9-21-210. A governing body may also hold an election for ascertaining the will of the electorate after adoption and publication of an initial resolution, even if no petition has been filed.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 2-8.

Attorney General Opinions. If a county commission authorizes the issuance of general obligation bonds, a petition protesting issuance of the bonds is filed, and the county commission then rescinds its resolution authorizing the bonds, the county is not required to hold an election on the proposition to issue the bonds. OAG 13-87, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 88 (11/6/13).

9-21-209. Election resolution.

If it is necessary to hold an election on the proposition to issue general obligation bonds or if the governing body decides to hold an election to ascertain the will of the electorate even if no petition has been filed, then the election shall be called by the governing body of the local government. Such election shall be held as an election on a question by the county election commission pursuant to §2-3-204. The governing body shall adopt a resolution (herein called the “election resolution”) which shall supersede by its adoption, and immediately upon its adoption, the initial resolution, if any. The election resolution shall state in substance:

The amount or maximum amount of general obligation bonds to be issued;

The public works project or projects for which the general obligation bonds are to be issued;

The rate or maximum rate of interest which the general obligation bonds are to bear;

A brief concise statement that the general obligation bonds will be payable:

From ad valorem taxes levied upon all the taxable property in the local government or a portion of the local government, if applicable, and if the latter, then a brief statement or description of such portion of the local government;

From revenues and, in the event of a deficiency in such revenues, from taxes; or

From taxes, and additionally secured by a pledge of revenues;

A proposition to issue the general obligation bonds as it is to appear on the ballot, including the maximum amount of such bonds to be authorized and the public works project or projects for which such bonds are to be issued; and

That the county election commission is to hold the election.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 2-9; 1998, ch. 618, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Special elections on general obligation bonds for school purposes, OAG 99-034, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (2/18/99).

If a county commission authorizes the issuance of general obligation bonds, a petition protesting issuance of the bonds is filed, and the county commission then rescinds its resolution authorizing the bonds, the county is not required to hold an election on the proposition to issue the bonds. OAG 13-87, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 88 (11/6/13).

If a local government rescinds a resolution authorizing the issuance of general obligation bonds—on which a referendum election would have been required—and instead adopts a different debt financing plan—on which a referendum election would not normally be required—the local government does not have to hold an election. OAG 18-41, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 40 (9/4/2018).

9-21-210. Eligibility to vote.

For general obligation bonds issued by a local government which are payable from taxes levied upon all taxable property in the local government, any registered voter in the local government may vote in the election.

For general obligation bonds issued by a local government which are payable from taxes levied on only a portion of the local government, any registered voter in that portion of the local government may vote in the election.

Upon receipt of the statement of the votes in the election from the county election commission, the governing body at or before its next regular meeting shall again canvass the returns and determine and declare the results of the election.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 2-10.

9-21-211. Limitation on election contests.

No suit, action or other proceeding contesting the validity of the bond election shall be entertained in any of the courts of this state unless such suit, action or other proceeding is commenced within ten (10) days from the date of canvassing of the returns and the determination and declaration of the results thereof by the governing body, whichever is later.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 2-11.

9-21-212. Waiting period for new election.

If an election on the proposition to issue general obligation bonds is had and a majority of the registered voters voting on the proposition do not vote in favor of the issuance of the general obligation bonds in question, then the proposition shall not again be the subject of an initial resolution until three (3) months have expired from the date of such election.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 2-12.

9-21-213. Terms of general obligation bonds — Citizens' bonds — Interest rate agreements.

The general obligation bonds may be sold in one (1) or more series, may bear such date or dates, shall mature at such time or times, not exceeding forty (40) years from their respective dates, may bear interest at a zero (0) rate or at such other rate or rates (which may vary from time to time), may be payable at such time or times, may be in such denomination or denominations, may be in such form, either coupon or registered, may carry such registration and conversion privileges, may be executed in such manner, may be payable in such medium of payment at such place or places, may be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premium, and may provide for the replacement of mutilated, destroyed, stolen or lost bonds, all as may be provided by resolution of the governing body of the local government. The term of the general obligation bonds shall not exceed the reasonably expected economic life of the project being financed with such bonds, as stated in the resolution authorizing the general obligation bonds. An erroneous estimate of the reasonably expected economic life of the project shall in no way affect the validity of such bonds.

A general obligation bond issue may be delivered as an installment bond payable as to principal and interest in equal or approximately equal installments for the term of the bond issue in accordance with the resolution authorizing the bond issue. The authorizing resolution shall stipulate the maximum annual principal and interest requirements during the full term of the installment bond issue.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, whenever the governing body of the local government is authorized to issue and sell general obligation bonds, it may by resolution authorize the issuance and sale of no more than three million dollars ($3,000,000) per issue of general obligation bonds to be known as citizens bonds; provided, that the aggregate amount of citizens bonds outstanding cannot exceed twenty percent (20%) of the aggregate outstanding debt of the local government. Citizens bonds shall mature at such time or times not exceeding twenty (20) years from their respective dates. The governing body of the local government must disclose to each purchaser of a citizens bond the interest rate of return on a fully taxable investment which would be equivalent to the tax-free yield on the citizens bond assuming the highest marginal rate of income tax under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C.), as amended.

Upon the adoption by the governing body of the initial resolution authorizing the issuance of the citizens bonds, the governing body shall submit for review and approval to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee the proposed method of pricing and the disclosure documents as required by this section. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall approve or disapprove the sale of citizens bonds in writing within fifteen (15) days from the date of receipt of the initial resolution and documentation required by this section or otherwise deemed appropriate. Approved citizens bonds may be sold at either a competitive or negotiated sale; however, no one (1) individual or entity may purchase twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the original offering of the citizens bonds. Prior to the negotiated sale of citizens bonds and as a factor in the comptroller of the treasury's or the comptroller's designee's approval of a negotiated sale of citizens bonds, the local government shall submit to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee certificates from two (2) disinterested bondhouses indicating the approximate rates of interest which, in the opinions of the bondhouses, would be bid if the citizens bonds were to be sold at a competitive sale.

The local government shall make provision in the resolution for the retirement of a portion of the citizens bonds equal to not less than one-twentieth (1/20) of the citizens bonds or such other provision to provide funds for retirement. In approving any issue of citizens bonds, the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee may waive the requirement for periodic retirement. No local elected official of a municipality or county may purchase the bonds authorized by this subsection (c).

With respect to all or any portion of any issue of general obligation bonds issued or anticipated to be issued hereunder, at any time during the term of the general obligation bonds, and upon receipt of a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finding that the contracts and agreements authorized herein are in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations as set forth in § 9-21-130, a local government by resolution may authorize and enter into interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, and other interest rate hedging agreements under such terms and conditions as the governing body of the local government may determine, including, without limitation, provisions permitting the local government to pay to or receive from any person or entity any loss of benefits under such agreement upon early termination thereof or default under such agreement.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 2-13; 1987, ch. 77, § 16; 1987, ch. 290, § 1; 1999, ch. 432, § 3; 2010, ch. 868, §§ 45, 46.

9-21-214. Powers to secure and to covenant as to general obligation bonds.

In order to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on general obligation bonds issued pursuant to this part and part 1 of this chapter, or in connection with such bonds, any local government has the power as to such bonds to:

Pledge the full faith, credit, and unlimited taxing power of the local government as to all taxable property in the local government or a portion of the local government, if applicable, to the punctual payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds;

Pledge all or any part of the fees, rents, tolls, interest earnings, or other charges received or receivable by the local government from any public works project or projects then existing or thereafter to be constructed, including any revenues derived or to be derived by a local government from a lease, agreement or contract with any other local government, local government instrumentality, the state, or a state or federal agency for the use of or in connection with such public works project or projects, to the punctual payment of the principal of and interest on bonds issued to finance such public works project or projects, or any other public works project or projects, and to covenant against thereafter pledging any such fees, rents, tolls, interest earnings or charges to any other bonds or any other obligations of the local government;

Provide for the terms, forms, registration, exchange, execution and authentication of the general obligation bonds in a manner not inconsistent with parts 1 and 2 of this chapter;

Covenant as to the use and disposition of the proceeds from the sale of the general obligation bonds in a manner not inconsistent with parts 1 and 2 of this chapter;

Covenant as to the fees, rents or tolls to be charged in connection with any public works project or projects and as to the use and disposition to be made thereof, and to enter into appropriate agreements with any other local government, local government instrumentality, the state, or a state or federal agency for such purpose with respect to a public works project which is to be owned or leased by a local government or local government instrumentality;

Covenant as to the operation and maintenance of the public works project;

Covenant to set aside or pay over reserves and sinking funds for the general obligation bonds and as to the disposition thereof;

Redeem the general obligation bonds, and covenant for their redemption and to provide the terms and conditions thereof;

Covenant as to its books of account, as to the inspection and audit thereof and as to the accounting methods; provided, that an audit of the books and accounts of the local government shall be made at least annually in accordance with §§ 4-3-304 and 6-56-105. All audits shall be performed in accordance with the standards established by the comptroller of the treasury;

Covenant and prescribe as to what occurrences shall constitute “events of default” and the terms and conditions upon which any or all of the general obligation bonds shall become or may be declared due before maturity and to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived;

Covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenant, condition or obligation;

Execute all instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers herein granted or in the performance of its covenants or duties;

Make such covenants and do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure the general obligation bonds, or in the discretion of the governing body, to make the general obligation bonds more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts or things may not be enumerated herein; it being the purpose hereof to give the local government power to do all things in the issuance of the general obligation bonds and for their security that may be consistent with the Constitution of Tennessee;

Pledge all or any part of the then unpledged rates, fees, rents or other charges to be received from its waterworks system to the punctual payment of the principal of and interest on any sewer bonds for the acquisition or construction of facilities for the collection, treatment and disposal of sewage and waste matter, including all property, real and personal, appurtenant thereto or in connection therewith, which pledge may be in addition to a pledge of the taxing power and in addition to a pledge of rates, fees, rents and charges received or receivable from any sewer system then existing or to be constructed;

Covenant that it will fix, levy and collect fees, rents, tolls or other charges for the privilege of parking motor vehicles in the space immediately adjacent to any parking meter which in its discretion, it may install and operate and maintain beside specified portions of the public streets;

Covenant that the costs of operating and maintaining parking facilities payable, in part, from the revenues of such parking facilities shall not include all or any part of the salaries of police officers employed in the enforcement of on-street parking regulations; and

Covenant and provide for the discharge and satisfaction and defeasance of all or any part of the general obligation bonds and the indebtedness evidenced thereby.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 2-14.

9-21-215. Tax resolution — Levy for payment of general obligation bonds.

At any time before delivering any general obligation bonds to be issued pursuant to this part and part 1 of this chapter, the governing body shall adopt a resolution (herein called the “tax resolution”) which shall recite in substance that adequate provision will be made for raising annually by tax upon the taxable property in the local government or a portion of the local government, if applicable, of a sum sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the general obligation bonds as the same shall become due.

A tax sufficient to pay when due the principal of and interest on the general obligation bonds shall be levied annually and assessed, collected and paid, in like manner with the other taxes of the local government and shall be in addition to all other taxes authorized or limited by law. It is the duty of the governing body to include in the annual levy a tax sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the general obligation bonds as the same become due; provided, that if the bonds are payable from taxes and additionally secured by a pledge of revenues, and if the tax resolution shall so provide, then the tax to be levied and assessed by the governing body may be reduced by such amount and under such conditions as may be determined in the tax resolution. When any part of the principal of or interest on any general obligation bonds issued by any local government pursuant to this part and part 1 of this chapter, not payable exclusively from the revenues of a public works project, are not paid when due, there shall be levied and assessed by the governing body and collected by the proper collecting officers at the first assessment, levy and collection of taxes in the local government after such omission or failure, a tax sufficient to pay the same.

If the general obligation bonds are issued to finance the cost of a public works project pursuant to a plan of improvement for a central business improvement district created pursuant to the Central Business Improvement District Act of 1971, compiled in title 7, chapter 84, the local government may, nevertheless, proceed to levy and collect assessments pursuant to the Central Business Improvement District Act; and the proceeds of such assessments when collected, other than amounts required to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds, shall be paid into the treasury of the local government and used to reimburse the treasury for any amounts paid out of the treasury to pay the principal of and interest on such bonds; and such moneys reimbursed to the treasury may be used, under the direction of the governing body of the local government, for any lawful corporate purpose for which taxes may be legally levied and collected.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 2-15.

9-21-216. Remedies of general obligation bondholders.

Any holder of general obligation bonds issued pursuant to parts 1 and 2 of this chapter has the right, in addition to all other rights:

By mandamus or other suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce such holder's rights against the local government, the governing body of the local government and any officer, agent, or employee of the local government, including, but not limited to, the right to require the local government, the governing body and any proper officer, agent or employee of the local government to assess, levy and collect taxes, and to fix and collect fees, rents, tolls, or other charges adequate to carry out any agreement as to, or pledge of, such taxes, fees, rents, tolls, or other charges, and to require the local government, the governing body of the local government and any officer, agent or employee of the local government to carry out any other covenants and agreements and to perform its and their duties under this chapter. No holder or holders of bonds payable exclusively from the revenues of a public works project shall ever have the right to compel the levying and collection of taxes to pay such bonds and the interest thereon; and

By action or suit in equity, to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or a violation of the rights of such holder or holders of general obligation bonds.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 2-16.